Washington statutes.
RCW 43.157.030

Application for designation—Project facilitator or coordinator.

(1) The department of commerce shall:

(a) Develop an application for designation of development projects as projects of statewide significance. The application must be accompanied by a letter of approval from the legislative authority of any jurisdiction that will have the proposed project of statewide significance within its boundaries. No designation of a project as a project of statewide significance shall be made without such letter of approval. The letter of approval must state that the jurisdiction joins in the request for the designation of the project as one of statewide significance and has or will hire the professional staff that will be required to expedite the processes necessary to the completion of a project of statewide significance. The development project proponents may provide the funding necessary for the jurisdiction to hire the professional staff that will be required to so expedite. The application shall contain information regarding the location of the project, the applicant's average employment in the state for the prior year, estimated new employment related to the project, estimated wages of employees related to the project, estimated time schedules for completion and operation, and other information required by the department; and

(b) Designate a development project as a project of statewide significance if the department determines:

(i) After review of the application under criteria adopted by rule, the development project will provide significant economic benefit to the local or state economy, or both, the project is aligned with the state's comprehensive plan for economic development under *RCW 43.162.020, and, by its designation, the project will not prevent equal consideration of all categories of proposals under RCW 43.157.010; and

(ii) The development project meets or will meet the requirements of RCW 43.157.010 regarding designation as a project of statewide significance.

(2) Any project designated by the legislature and codified in this chapter is not subject to the application requirements set out in subsection (1) of this section.

(3) The office of regulatory assistance shall assign a project facilitator or coordinator to each project of statewide significance to:

(a) Assist in the scoping and coordinating functions provided for in chapter 43.42 RCW;

(b) Assemble a team of state and local government and private officials to help meet the planning, permitting, and development needs of each project, which team shall include those responsible for planning, permitting and licensing, infrastructure development, workforce development services including higher education, transportation services, and the provision of utilities; and

(c) Work with each team member to expedite their actions in furtherance of the project.

[ 2017 c 288 s 3; 2009 c 421 s 4; 2003 c 54 s 3; 1997 c 369 s 4.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 43.162.020 was repealed by 2014 c 112 s 123.

Finding—2017 c 288: See note following RCW 43.157.010.

Effective date—2009 c 421: See note following RCW 43.157.005.